Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202526-118
Protection order; foreign protection order; violation; penalties.

(1) Any person, except the petitioner, who knowingly violates a protection order issued pursuant to the Protection Orders Act, after service or notice as described in subsection (4) of section 26-114, or a valid foreign protection order recognized pursuant to section 26-123 or 26-124, shall be guilty of an offense and punished as provided in this section.

(2) For a violation involving a domestic abuse protection order, a sexual assault protection order, a valid foreign domestic abuse protection order recognized pursuant to section 26-123, or a valid foreign sexual assault protection order recognized pursuant to section 26-124, a violation of this section is a Class I misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class IV felony for any second or subsequent offense.

(3) For a violation of a harassment protection order or a valid foreign harassment protection order recognized pursuant to section 26-124, a violation of this section is a Class II misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class I misdemeanor for any second or subsequent offense.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 18.